Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB159.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Environmental Hearing Board of the Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Record of decision." The document issued by the department to an applicant which conveys the department's approval or denial of a permit application, along with each document or other evidence issued, created or relied upon by the department in its consideration of the application, including, but not limited to, correspondence to or from an applicant, any administrative completeness determination, any technical deficiency letter or written response thereto , any records or documents submitted to the department regarding the application, any public comment on the application and any written response by the department or the applicant regarding public comment on a permit application, other State agency written comment to a permit application and written response by the department or permit applicant."Rules committee." The Environmental Hearing Board Rules Committee established under section 5."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Resources of the Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Jurisdiction.* * *(c.1) Standard of review.--In an appeal of a permit issued by the department in which a record of decision has been prepared by the department at the time of the permit decision, the review by the board shall be exclusively limited to the record of decision. A party shall not be permitted to present new evidence before the board that was not part of the record of decision as considered by the department. Any party challenging the decision of the department before the board must 20250SB0159PN0109 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demonstrate, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the department committed an abuse of its discretion in denying or granting the permit application being appealed.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0159PN0109 - 3 - 12345